Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202018-2413
Power project, defined.

Power project shall mean any plant, works, system, facilities, and real and personal property of any nature whatsoever, together with all parts thereof and appurtenances thereto, used or useful in the generation, production, transmission, conservation, transformation, distribution, purchase, sale, exchange, or interchange of electric power and energy, or any interest therein or right to capacity thereof, any energy conservation system or device for reducing the energy demands or any interest therein, and the acquisition of energy sources or fuel of any kind, for any such purposes, including, without limitation, facilities for the acquisition, transformation, collection, utilization, and disposition of nuclear fuel or solar, geothermal, hydroelectric, or wind energy and the acquisition or construction and operation of facilities for extracting fuel including agricultural ethyl alcohol from natural deposits or agricultural products, for converting it for use in another form, for burning it in place, or for transportation and storage.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 13;

Laws 2020, LB858, § 3.
August 07, 2020